Washington statutes.
RCW 11.100.015

Guardians, guardianships and funds are subject to chapter.

In addition to other fiduciaries, a guardian of any estate is a fiduciary within the meaning of this chapter; and in addition to other trusts, a guardianship of any estate is a trust within the meaning of this chapter; and in addition to other trust funds, guardianship funds are trust funds within the meaning of this chapter.

[ 1985 c 30 s 64. Prior: 1955 c 33 s 30.24.015; prior: 1951 c 218 s 1. Formerly RCW 30.24.015.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.